Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-234
Town meeting; minutes; duty of town clerk; duty of town treasurer.

The town clerk elected or appointed shall be the clerk of the town meeting, and shall keep faithfully minutes of its proceedings, in which he shall enter at length every order or direction, and all rules and regulations made by such meeting. If the town clerk is absent from the town meeting, the town treasurer shall perform the duties of the town clerk. The person keeping the minutes shall sign the same.

Laws 1895, c. 28, § 32, p. 142;

R.S.1913, § 1018;

C.S.1922, § 920;

C.S.1929, § 26-234;

R.S.1943, § 23-234;

Laws 1973, LB 75, § 5.